Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-542
District; levy and collection of taxes; classification of methods.

In addition to the other means of providing revenue for such districts, the board shall have power and authority to levy and collect taxes and special assessments for maintaining and operating such works and paying the obligations and indebtedness of the district by any one or more of the methods or combinations thereof, classified as follows:

Class A. To levy and collect taxes upon the taxable value of the taxable property within the district;

Class B. To levy and collect assessments for special benefits accruing to lands within municipalities for which water service is furnished;

Class C. To levy and collect assessments for special benefits accruing to lands within irrigation districts for which water service is furnished; and

Class D. To levy and collect assessments for special benefits accruing to lands for which water service is furnished.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 14, p. 538;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 38;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 38.

This and succeeding seventeen sections provide for fiscal management of a reclamation district, and give the board of directors power to levy and collect taxes and special assessments. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).